en: Jelly desserts, jellies dessert, gelatin desserts
de: Götterspeisen, götterspeise
es: Gelatinas, postres gelificados
fi: Hyytelöjälkiruoat
fr: Desserts gélifiés
hr: Žele deserti
it: Gelatina dolce
ja: ゼリー
lt: Želė desertai, želė desertas, želatinos desertai
pt: Sobremesas de gelatina

en: Flavoured milk jelly
fr: Lait gélifié aromatisé

en: Refrigerated flavoured milk jelly covered with caramel
fr: Lait gélifié aromatisé nappé caramel rayon frais

en: Refrigerated flavoured milk jelly with reduced fat and sugar
fr: Lait gélifié aromatisé allégé en matière grasse et en sucre rayon frais

en: Refrigerated flavoured milk jelly
fr: Lait gélifié aromatisé rayon frais

en: Tartufo
xx: Tartufo
de: Tartufo
fr: Tartufo
hr: Tartufo
it: Tartufo
ja: タルトゥフォ, タルトゥーフォ
nl: Tartufo

en: Cheesecakes, Refrigerated cheesecake
ca: Pastís de formatge
de: Käsekuchen
es: Tartas de queso
fi: juustokakut
fr: Cheesecakes, Cheesecake rayon frais, Gâteau au fromage frais
hr: Kolači od sira
it: Cheesecake
ja: チーズケーキ
lt: atšaldyti sūrio pyragai
nl: Cheesecakes, Cheesecake

en: Plain cheesecakes
fr: Cheesecakes natures

en: Vanilla cheesecakes
de: Vanillekäsekuchen
fr: Cheesecakes à la vanille
hr: Cheesecakes sa sirom od vanilije
ja: バニラチーズケーキ
lt: Vaniliniai sūrio pyragai, sūrio pyragai su vanile
nl: Vanillecheesecakes, Vanillecheesecake

en: Cheesecakes with fruits
es: Cheesecake con fruta
fr: Cheesecakes aux fruits
hr: Sirnice s voćem
lt: Vaisiniai sūrio pyragai, sūrio pyragai su vaisiais

en: Strawberry cheesecakes
de: Erdbeerkäsekuchen
fr: Cheesecakes à la fraise
hr: Tortice sa sirom od jagoda
lt: Braškiniai sūrio pyragai, sūrio pyragai su braškėmis
nl: Aardbeiencheesecakes, Aardbeiencheesecake

en: Raspberry cheesecakes
de: Himbeerkäsekuchen
fr: Cheesecakes à la framboise
hr: Sirnice od malina
lt: Avietiniai sūrio pyragai sūrio pyragai su avietėmis
nl: Frambozencheesecakes, Frambozencheesecake

en: Cheesecake with red berries
de: Käsekuchen mit roten Beeren
fr: Cheesecake aux fruits rouges
hr: Torta od sira s crvenim bobicama
lt: Raudonų uogų sūrio pyragai, sūrio pyragai su raudonomis uogomis
nl: Rode vruchten cheesecakes, Rode vruchten cheesecake

en: Caramel cheesecakes
de: Karamellkäsekuchen
fr: Cheesecakes au caramel
hr: Karamel sirnice
lt: Karameliniai sūrio pyragai, sūrio pyragai su karamele
nl: Caramelcheesecakes, Caramelcheesecake

en: Lemon cheesecakes
de: Zitronenkäsekuchen
fr: Cheesecakes au citron
hr: Cheesecakes sa sirom od limuna
lt: Citrininiai sūrio pyragai, sūrio pyragai su citrinomis
nl: Citroencheesecakes, Citroencheesecake

en: Speculoos cheesecakes
de: Spekulatiuskäsekuchen
fr: Cheesecakes au speculoos
hr: Speculoos kolači od sira
nl: Speculooscheesecakes, Speculooscheesecake, Kandijcheesecake

en: Chocolate cakes
bg: Шоколадов сладкиш
ca: Pastissos de xocolata
da: Chokoladekage
de: Schokoladenkuchen
es: Pasteles de chocolate
fi: suklaakakut
fr: Gâteaux au chocolat
he: עוגות שוקולד
hr: Čokoladni kolači
hu: Csokoládés sütemények
it: Torte al cioccolato
ja: チョコレートケーキ
lt: Šokoladiniai pyragai, Šokoladiniai tortai, Šokoladiniai pyragaičiai
nl: Chocoladecakes, Chocoladecake
pt: Bolos de chocolate
ru: Шоколадные торты
zh: 巧克力蛋糕

en: Molten chocolate cakes, Chocolate lava cake, Chocolate cake with melting centre
ar: لافا كيك
es: Pastel de chocolate fundido
fr: Moelleux au chocolat, gâteau fondant au chocolat
he: עוגת שוקולד מותך
hr: Kolači od rastopljene čokolade
id: Kue cokelat cair
nl: Chocolade lava cakes
zh: 熔岩巧克力蛋糕

en: Brownies
de: Brownies, Brownie
es: Brownies
fr: Brownies, Brownie
hr: Brownies
it: Brownies
ja: ブラウニー
nl: Brownies, Brownie

en: Fruit cakes, Fruit cake
de: Obstkuchen, Fruchtkuchen
es: Tartas de frutas, Pasteles de frutas
fi: hedelmäkakut
fr: Cakes aux fruits, cake aux fruits, cake aux fruits confits, cakes aux fruits confits
hr: Voćni kolači
ja: フルーツケーキ
lt: Vaisiniai pyragai, vaisiniai tortai, vaisiniai pyragaičiai
nl: Vruchtencakes